Maine, session 132, LD1281.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 404-A is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 404-A
HEALTH CARE FACILITY DIRECT CARE NURSE STAFFING
§1791. Short title
This chapter may be known and cited as "the Maine Quality Care Act."
§1792. Application and construction
1. Application. All health care facilities are subject to the requirements of this chapter.
2. Construction. This chapter may not be construed to:
A. Change the scope of practice of registered nurses licensed under Title 32, chapter
31, subchapters 2-A and 3; or
B. Provide an exemption from the minimum staffing requirements of direct care
registered nurses if the patient condition or patient care unit name is different from the
term used in this chapter but the services provided are substantially similar.
§1793. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Ancillary staff person. "Ancillary staff person" means any person who supports
patient care services in a health care facility through regular, delegated tasks performed
under the coordination of a direct care registered nurse for the delivery of safe, therapeutic
and effective patient care.
2. Competency. "Competency" means the ability of a direct care registered nurse to
integrate and act on the nurse's knowledge, skills, professional judgment and experience to
ensure safe, therapeutic and effective care to a specific patient population and for the
severity of illness in each patient care unit.
3. Critical access hospital. "Critical access hospital" has the same meaning as in
section 7932, subsection 10.
4. Declared state of emergency. "Declared state of emergency" means an emergency
declared by an authorized person within federal, state or local government relating to
circumstances that are unpredictable and unavoidable, affect the delivery of medical care
and require an immediate or exceptional level of emergency or other medical services at a
particular health care facility. "Declared state of emergency" does not include an
emergency relating to a labor dispute in the health care industry or consistent understaffing
in a health care facility.
5. Direct care registered nurse. "Direct care registered nurse" means a registered
nurse licensed under Title 32, chapter 31, subchapter 3 who is primarily responsible for
providing direct, in-person, hands-on patient care in a health care facility by engaging in
Page 1 - 132LR1940(01)

318 the nursing process within the nurse's scope of practice while exercising professional
329 judgment in the best interests of the patient at all times.
6. Health care facility. "Health care facility" means a hospital licensed under chapter
405, a freestanding emergency department or an ambulatory surgical facility licensed under
chapter 405. "Health care facility" does not include a state institution as defined in Title
34-B, section 1001, subsection 8.
7. Patient care unit. "Patient care unit" means any area of a health care facility in
which a patient receives care.
8. Professional judgment. "Professional judgment" means the application of a direct
care registered nurse's knowledge, expertise and experience and the nurse's assessment of
a patient, data, information and scientific evidence to understand the problems, issues or
concerns of a patient, to ensure safe, therapeutic and effective patient care and to make
decisions about a patient's care.
§1794. Minimum staffing requirements of direct care registered nurses in health care
facilities
Except as provided in sections 1795 and 1796, a health care facility shall assign at least
the number of direct care registered nurses at all times during every shift consistent with
the minimum requirements established in this section and at no time may a health care
facility assign fewer than 2 direct care registered nurses in a patient care unit.
1. Requirements. A health care facility shall assign a direct care registered nurse to
no more than:
A. One patient when:
(1) The patient is receiving critical care or intensive care; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit, other than a unit providing
emergency services, that receives patients requiring critical care or intensive care,
including, but not limited to, a critical care unit, an intensive care unit or a patient
care unit with neonatal intensive care or pediatric intensive care patients;
B. One patient when:
(1) The patient is in an operating room; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to an operating room.
The health care facility shall assign a minimum of one scrub assistant for each patient
in an operating room in addition to the assigned direct care registered nurse;
C. One patient when the patient is receiving conscious sedation;
D. One patient when:
(1) The patient is receiving phase 1 postanesthesia care; or
(2) The patient is receiving postanesthesia care and has not attained 18 years of
age;
E. Two patients when the patients have attained 18 years of age and are receiving phase
2 postanesthesia care;
F. Three patients when:
Page 2 - 132LR1940(01)

(1) The patients are receiving step-down or intermediate care; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring step-
down or intermediate care, including, but not limited to, a step-down or
intermediate care unit;
G. Three patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving emergency services and do not require critical care
or trauma services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
emergency services, including, but not limited to, an emergency department or
emergency room;
H. One patient when the patient is receiving emergency services and requires critical
care;
I. One patient when the patient is receiving emergency services and requires trauma
services;
J. Three patients when the patients are antepartum and not in active labor;
K. Two patients when the patients are antepartum and require continuous fetal
monitoring;
L. One patient when the nurse is assigned to initiate the patient for epidural anesthesia
or the nurse is assigned as the circulating nurse for a cesarean delivery;
M. One patient when the patient is in active labor;
N. One patient who is giving birth when the nurse has been assigned only to that patient
and one newborn patient when the nurse has been assigned only to that newborn
patient;
O. One newborn patient when the patient is unstable, as determined by the nurse;
P. One patient couplet of one parent and one newborn when the parent has given birth
within the previous 2 hours. In the case of multiple births, one nurse must be assigned
for each additional newborn when the nurse has been assigned only to that newborn;
Q. Two patient couplets of one parent and one newborn when the parent patients are
postpartum;
R. Four patients when the patients are receiving postpartum or postoperative
gynecological care and when the nurse has been assigned only to patients receiving
postpartum or postoperative gynecological care;
S. Two newborn patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving intermediate care; or
(2) The nurse has been assigned to a patient care unit that receives newborn
patients requiring intermediate care, including, but not limited to, a nursery that
provides intermediate care;
T. Three patients when:
(1) The patients have not attained 18 years of age; or
Page 3 - 132LR1940(01)

(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients who have not
attained 18 years of age, including, but not limited to, a pediatric unit;
U. Two patients who have not attained 18 years of age when:
(1) The patients are receiving bone marrow transplant services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives bone marrow transplant
patients who have not attained 18 years of age;
V. One patient when:
(1) The patient is receiving coronary care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
coronary care services;
W. One patient when:
(1) The patient requires burn care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring burn
care services;
X. One patient when:
(1) The patient is receiving acute respiratory care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring acute
respiratory care services;
Y. Three patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving telemetry services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
telemetry services;
Z. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving medical surgical care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
medical surgical care services;
AA. Three patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving observational care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
observational care services;
BB. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving acute rehabilitation services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring acute
rehabilitation services;
CC. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving specialty care services; or
Page 4 - 132LR1940(01)

(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit receiving patients requiring
specialty care services, including, but not limited to, a specialty care unit,
neurological care unit, gastrointestinal unit, orthopedic unit or any other unit that
is organized, operated and maintained to provide care for a specific medical
condition or a specific patient population;
DD. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving presurgical admissions services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
presurgical admissions services;
EE. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving ambulatory surgical care services or procedures; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that provides ambulatory surgical
care services or procedures;
FF. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving psychiatric treatment or services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
psychiatric treatment or services; and
GG. Four patients in any other patient care unit or for any other patient condition.
A health care facility may assign a direct care registered nurse to patients receiving triage
services as long as the nurse is performing only triage functions and is able to be
immediately available to patients requiring triage services arriving in a patient care unit
that receives patients requiring emergency services, including, but not limited to, an
emergency department or emergency room.
2. Intensity of care. A health care facility shall assign direct care registered nurses in
a patient care unit in accordance with subsection 1 in order to meet the highest level of
intensity and type of care provided in the patient care unit. If more than one requirement
in subsection 1 applies to a patient, a health care facility shall assign a direct care registered
nurse in accordance with the lowest numerical patient assignment applicable to the patient.
3. Patient need. If, in the professional judgment of a direct care registered nurse, a
patient requires the assignment of more than the minimum number of direct care registered
nurses required in accordance with this section, a health care facility shall assign additional
direct care registered nurses to the patient consistent with the direct care registered nurse's
professional judgment.
§1795. Exception to staffing requirements
1. Declared state of emergency. It is a defense to a complaint alleging a violation of
section 1794 or 1796 filed against a health care facility under chapter 405 if the facility
demonstrates that:
A. The violation resulted from a declared state of emergency; and
B. The facility undertook prompt and diligent efforts to maintain the staffing
assignments required pursuant to sections 1794 and 1796, despite the declared state of
emergency.
Page 5 - 132LR1940(01)

2. Local emergency event. It is a defense to a complaint alleging a violation of section
1794 or 1796 filed against a health care facility under chapter 405 if the facility
demonstrates that:
A. The violation resulted from an unpredictable and uncontrollable rapid increase in
patient levels at the health care facility due to a local emergency event; and
B. The health care facility undertook prompt and diligent efforts to maintain the
staffing assignments required pursuant to sections 1794 and 1796, despite the local
emergency event.
For purposes of this subsection, "local emergency event" is as defined by the department
by rule.
§1796. Minimum staffing requirements of direct care registered nurses in critical
access hospitals
A critical access hospital shall assign at least the number of direct care registered nurses
at all times during every shift consistent with the minimum requirements established in this
section. A critical access hospital may not at any time assign fewer than 2 direct care
registered nurses in a patient care unit.
1. Requirements beginning July 2026. Beginning July 1, 2026, a critical access
hospital shall assign a direct care registered nurse to no more than:
A. Two patients when the patients are receiving neonatal intensive care;
B. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving step-down or intermediate care; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring step-
down or intermediate care, including, but not limited to, a step-down or
intermediate care unit;
C. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving telemetry services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
telemetry services;
D. Five patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving medical surgical care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
medical surgical care services; and
E. Five patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving specialty care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit receiving patients requiring
specialty care services, including, but not limited to, a specialty care unit,
neurological care unit, gastrointestinal unit, orthopedic unit or any other unit that
is organized, operated and maintained to provide care for a specific medical
condition or a specific patient population.
This subsection is repealed July 1, 2027.
Page 6 - 132LR1940(01)

2. Requirements beginning July 2027. Beginning July 1, 2027, a critical access
hospital shall assign a direct care registered nurse to no more than:
A. One patient when the patient is receiving neonatal intensive care;
B. Three patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving step-down or intermediate care; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring step-
down or intermediate care, including, but not limited to, a step-down or
intermediate care unit;
C. Three patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving telemetry services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
telemetry services;
D. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving medical surgical care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit that receives patients requiring
medical surgical care services; and
E. Four patients when:
(1) The patients are receiving specialty care services; or
(2) The nurse is assigned to a patient care unit receiving patients requiring
specialty care services, including, but not limited to, a specialty care unit,
neurological care unit, gastrointestinal unit, orthopedic unit or any other unit that
is organized, operated and maintained to provide care for a specific medical
condition or a specific patient population.
§1797. Department to establish critical access hospital flexibility
1. Department to establish critical access hospital flexibility. The department shall
establish a process for critical access hospitals to request flexibility regarding the direct
care registered nurse minimum staffing requirements set forth in section 1796.
2. Criteria. In establishing the process, the department must include the following
criteria:
A. The department may, on a case-by-case basis, approve flexibility requests related
to the direct care registered nurse minimum staffing requirements;
B. The flexibility allowances must cover a period of time not to exceed 6 months;
C. Only flexibility requests that do not jeopardize the health, safety or well-being of
patients affected may be considered;
D. A critical access hospital seeking flexibility shall submit a written request with
supporting evidence to the department;
E. A critical access hospital that has laid off any clinical staff within the previous 6
months is not eligible for a flexibility allowance; and
Page 7 - 132LR1940(01)

F. Where applicable, the department shall solicit comments from the collective
bargaining agent that represents the registered nurses in a critical access hospital that
is seeking flexibility.
§1798. Staffing calculation requirements
The following provisions apply to the calculation of the direct care registered nurse
minimum staffing assignments required pursuant to sections 1794 and 1796.
1. Assignment. A patient must be assigned to a direct care registered nurse. A patient
is considered to be assigned to a direct care registered nurse if the nurse accepts
responsibility for the patient's care and meets the requirements under section 1799.
2. Averaging prohibited. For the purpose of calculating staffing, a health care facility
may not average the number of patients or number of direct care registered nurses in a
patient care unit during any one shift or over any period of time.
3. Direct care required. A health care facility may not include in the calculation an
ancillary staff person or a nurse who does not provide direct, in-person, hands-on patient
care, including, but not limited to, a nurse administrator, nurse supervisor, nurse manager,
charge nurse or case manager. A registered nurse who is also a nurse administrator, nurse
supervisor, nurse manager, charge nurse, case manager or any other health care facility
administrator or supervisor may be included in the calculation of the direct care registered
nurse minimum staffing assignments required pursuant to sections 1794 and 1796 if the
registered nurse:
A. Has a current and active direct patient care assignment;
B. Provides direct patient care in compliance with the requirements of this chapter;
C. Has demonstrated current competency in providing care in the assigned patient care
unit and has received orientation to the patient care unit sufficient to provide safe,
therapeutic and effective care to patients in the patient care unit;
D. Has the principal responsibility of providing direct patient care and has no
additional job duties during the time period during which the nurse has a patient
assignment; and
E. Is providing relief for a direct care registered nurse during breaks, meals and other
routine or expected absences from the patient care unit.
4. Prohibited assignments. A health care facility may not assign an ancillary staff
person to perform tasks that involve the professional judgment or skill of a direct care
registered nurse, including, but not limited to, patient assessment, evaluation and
implementation of a nursing care plan and administration of medications, even if the
provision of care is under the oversight of a direct care registered nurse.
5. Additional duties. A health care facility may not include a direct care registered
nurse in the calculation unless the nurse has the principal responsibility of providing direct
patient care to the assigned patient and has no additional job duties other than direct patient
care, such as a nurse with triage, external communications or emergency transport duties.
6. Mandatory overtime prohibited. A health care facility may not impose a
mandatory overtime requirement on a direct care registered nurse.
Page 8 - 132LR1940(01)

7. Layoffs prohibited. A health care facility may not lay off or otherwise reduce the
availability of ancillary staff persons in order to meet the direct care registered nurse
minimum staffing assignments required pursuant to sections 1794 and 1796.
8. Electronic monitoring prohibited. A health care facility may not use any form of
electronic monitoring, including, but not limited to, video monitoring or other remote
monitoring, to fulfill the minimum staffing requirements.
9. Planning required. A health care facility shall plan for routine fluctuations in the
number of patients being treated in the facility resulting from circumstances such as
admissions, discharges and transfers of patients in order to maintain minimum staffing
requirements pursuant to sections 1794 and 1796.
§1799. Assignment of direct care registered nurses
A health care facility shall, no less frequently than once per shift, assign to a patient a
direct care registered nurse responsible for the provision of care to the patient in accordance
with this section.
1. Assignment of direct care registered nurses generally. A health care facility may
not assign a direct care registered nurse to a patient unless the nurse has demonstrated
current competency in providing care to patients in the patient care unit and has also
received orientation to the patient care unit sufficient to provide care to patients.
2. Assignment and relief of direct care registered nurses during absences. A health
care facility may assign a direct care registered nurse to relieve the originally assigned
direct care registered nurse for breaks, meals or other routine or expected absences only if
the relieving nurse has demonstrated to the facility current competency in providing care
to patients in the patient care unit and received orientation to the patient care unit sufficient
to provide care to patients.
3. Criteria. A health care facility shall include criteria for making a staffing
assignment under this section in its policies and procedures.
§1800. Use of technology
1. Electronic monitoring prohibited for patient protection. A health care facility
may not use any form of electronic monitoring, including, but not limited to, video
monitoring or other remote monitoring to substitute for the direct observation by a direct
care registered nurse or an ancillary staff person that is required for patient protection.
2. Technology prohibited for nursing process. A health care facility may not adopt
policies or practices that:
A. Employ health information technology, algorithms used to achieve a medical or
nursing care objective, systems based on artificial intelligence or clinical practice
guidelines that limit or substitute for the direct patient care provided by an assigned
direct care registered nurse in the performance of functions that are part of the nursing
process, including the full exercise of professional judgment, or that limit a direct care
registered nurse from acting as a patient advocate under section 1801 in the exclusive
interests of the patient; or
B. Penalize a direct care registered nurse for overriding technology or guidelines
prohibited in paragraph A if in the direct care registered nurse's professional judgment
Page 9 - 132LR1940(01)

413 and in accordance with the direct care registered nurse's scope of practice in accordance
424 with Title 32, chapter 31 it is in the best interests of the patient to do so.
3. Construction. This Act may not be construed to limit the use of technology by a
direct care registered nurse as part of the direct care registered nurse's typical duties and
scope of practice.
§1801. Patient advocacy
1. Patient advocacy. A direct care registered nurse has a duty and right to act based
on the direct care registered nurse's professional judgment, provide care in the exclusive
interests of the patient and act as the patient's advocate.
2. Professional judgment. A direct care registered nurse shall exercise professional
judgment in the performance of the direct care registered nurse's duties within the direct
care registered nurse's scope of practice in accordance with Title 32, chapter 31 in the
exclusive interests of the patient. A direct care registered nurse's actions under this
subsection may not, for any purpose, be considered, relied upon or represented as a job
function, authority, responsibility or activity undertaken for the purpose of serving the
business, commercial, operational or other institutional interests of the direct care
registered nurse's employer.
3. Nursing care. A direct care registered nurse shall provide competent, safe,
therapeutic and effective nursing care to an assigned patient. Before accepting a patient
assignment, a direct care registered nurse must:
A. Have the necessary knowledge, judgment, skills and ability to provide the required
care;
B. Determine, based on the nurse's professional judgment, whether the nurse is
competent to perform the nursing care needed by a patient who is in a particular patient
care unit or who has a particular diagnosis, condition, prognosis or other determinative
characteristic affecting nursing care; and
C. Determine, based on the nurse's professional judgment, whether acceptance of a
patient assignment would expose the patient or nurse to the risk of harm.
4. Objections. As part of a direct care registered nurse's patient advocacy, a direct
care registered nurse may object to or refuse to accept or participate in any activity, policy,
practice, assignment or task in a health care facility if the direct care registered nurse:
A. Believes, based on the nurse's professional judgment, that the activity, policy,
practice, assignment or task would violate Title 32, chapter 31 or rules adopted
pursuant to that chapter or be outside the nurse's scope of practice;
B. Believes, based on the nurse's professional judgment, that the activity, policy,
practice, assignment or task would violate the minimum staffing requirements under
section 1794 or 1796 or would violate any other provision of this chapter; or
C. Believes, based on the nurse's professional judgment, that the nurse is not prepared
by education, training or experience to fulfill the assignment without compromising
the safety of a patient or jeopardizing the license of the nurse.
Page 10 - 132LR1940(01)

5. Interference and retaliation prohibited. A health care facility, an employee of a
health care facility who is primarily responsible for managing the facility or an employee
of the facility who is primarily responsible for managing patient care services may not:
A. Interfere with or prevent a direct care registered nurse from exercising professional
judgment under this section;
B. Limit a direct care registered nurse in performing duties that are a part of the nursing
process, including full exercise of professional judgment in assessment, planning,
implementation and evaluation of care;
C. Limit a direct care registered nurse in acting as a patient advocate in the exclusive
interests of the patient; or
D. Discharge from duty, threaten or otherwise retaliate against a direct care registered
nurse who reports an unsafe practice or a violation of policy, federal or state law,
federal regulation or state rule.
6. Application of Whistleblowers' Protection Act. A violation of subsection 5 is a
violation of Title 26, chapter 7, subchapter 5-B.
§1802. Record and notice requirements
A health care facility shall maintain and disclose records relating to actual staffing
assignments and any method used to meet the requirements of this chapter in accordance
with this section and rules adopted by the department.
1. Record contents. Records maintained and disclosed under this section must
include:
A. The number of patients in each patient care unit during each shift;
B. The identity and duty hours of each direct care registered nurse assigned to each
patient in each patient care unit during each shift;
C. The identity and duty hours of each ancillary staff person for each patient care unit
during each shift;
D. Certification that each direct care registered nurse received rest and meal breaks and
the identity and duty hours of each direct care registered nurse who provided relief
during the breaks;
E. A copy of each notice required under subsection 4; and
F. A description, including a list of actions taken and the date of each action, of efforts
made by the health care facility to maintain the staffing assignments required pursuant
to sections 1794 and 1796, if a facility does not maintain the staffing assignments
required pursuant to sections 1794 and 1796 during a declared state of emergency or
local emergency event pursuant to section 1795, subsection 2.
2. Required duration of records maintenance. Records under this section must be
maintained for at least 3 years.
3. Records submitted to department. A health care facility shall submit all records
under this section to the department as a condition of licensure under chapter 405. The
chief nursing officer shall certify that records submitted to the department pursuant to this
subsection completely and accurately reflect staffing assignments in each patient care unit.
Page 11 - 132LR1940(01)

412 The certification must be executed under penalty of perjury and must contain an express
423 acknowledgment that any false statement constitutes fraud and is subject to criminal
434 prosecution or civil penalties.
4. Notice requirements. A health care facility shall post in each patient care unit a
notice in a form specified by department rule that:
A. Explains the requirements of record maintenance under this section;
B. Includes actual direct care registered nurse staffing assignments in each patient care
unit during each shift;
C. Includes the actual number of ancillary staff persons and the skill mix of the
ancillary staff persons in each patient care unit during each shift;
D. Identifies the variance between the required and actual staffing assignments in each
patient care unit during each shift; and
E. Is visible, conspicuous and accessible to health care facility staff, patients and the
public.
5. Records publicly accessible. Records maintained under this section must be made
available to the department, direct care registered nurses, a nurse's collective bargaining
agent and the public.
§1803. Audits
The department shall conduct periodic audits to ensure that a health care facility has
implemented the direct care registered nurse minimum staffing requirements pursuant to
this chapter.
§1804. Administrative sanctions; investigation
In addition to the penalties provided under section 1806 and licensure requirements
under section 1817, the department may impose a sanction under this section in conformity
with Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 4.
1. Notice. The department may direct by written notice a health care facility to correct
any violations under this chapter and any rules adopted under this chapter in a manner and
within a time frame that the department determines appropriate to ensure compliance or
protect the public health. The health care facility shall correct any violations within the
time frame determined by the department.
2. Investigation. The department may investigate complaints against a health care
facility in order to ensure compliance with this chapter and any rules adopted under this
chapter.
3. Administrative penalties. The department may impose the following
administrative penalties on a health care facility.
A. Beginning July 1, 2026, except as provided in paragraph C, for violations of
subsection 1 or sections 1794, 1796, 1798, 1799, 1800, 1801 and 1802 or rules adopted
to implement this section or those sections, the department may assess a fine of not
more than $5,000 per violation. Each day a health care facility violates subsection 1 or
section 1794, 1796, 1798, 1799, 1800, 1801 or 1802 constitutes a separate offense.
This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2027.
Page 12 - 132LR1940(01)

B. Beginning July 1, 2027, except as provided in paragraph D, for violations of
subsection 1 or sections 1794, 1796, 1798, 1799, 1800, 1801 and 1802 or rules adopted
to implement this section or those sections, the department may assess a fine of not
more than $10,000 per violation. Each day a health care facility violates subsection 1
or section 1794, 1796, 1798, 1799, 1800, 1801 or 1802 constitutes a separate offense.
C. Beginning July 1, 2026, for violations of section 1801, subsection 5 or a rule
adopted to implement that subsection, the department may assess a fine of not more
than $12,500 per nursing shift.
This paragraph is repealed July 1, 2027.
D. Beginning July 1, 2027, for violations of section 1801, subsection 5 or a rule
adopted to implement that subsection, the department may assess a fine of not more
$25,000 per nursing shift.
§1805. Civil violations
This section governs civil violations under this chapter.
1. Violation of health care facility staffing requirements. This subsection applies
to violations of sections 1794, 1796, 1798, 1799, 1800 and 1802 and section 1804,
subsection 1.
A. A health care facility may not violate section 1794, 1796, 1798, 1799, 1800 or 1802
or section 1804, subsection 1 or a rule adopted to implement those sections.
B. A health care facility that violates paragraph A commits a civil violation for which
a fine may be adjudged as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, not more than $5,000 per nursing shift in violation.
This subparagraph is repealed July 1, 2027; and
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, not more than $10,000 per nursing shift in violation.
Each day a health care facility violates paragraph A is a separate offense.
2. Violation for interference with or retaliation against direct care registered
nurse for objection or refusal. This subsection applies to violations of section 1801,
subsection 5.
A. A health care facility, an employee of a health care facility who is primarily
responsible for managing the health care facility or an employee of a health care facility
who is primarily responsible for managing patient care services may not violate section
1801, subsection 5 or any rules adopted to implement that subsection.
B. A health care facility, an employee of a health care facility who is primarily
responsible for managing the health care facility or an employee of a health care facility
who is primarily responsible for managing patient care services who violates paragraph
A commits a civil violation for which a fine may be adjudged as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, not more than $12,500 per violation. This
subparagraph is repealed July 1, 2027; and
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, not more than $25,000 per violation.
§1806. Enforcement
Page 13 - 132LR1940(01)

The Attorney General may file a complaint with the District Court seeking civil
penalties or injunctive relief or both for violations of this chapter.
§1807. Complaints
A person may file a complaint with the department against a health care facility for
violations of this chapter. The department shall refer any complaint alleging a violation of
section 1801, subsection 5 to the Maine Human Rights Commission.
§1808. Rulemaking
The department may adopt rules to implement this chapter. The department shall rely
on and incorporate principles of the nursing profession in rules adopted pursuant to this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are major substantive rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
§1809. Applicability
The minimum staffing requirements in section 1794 apply for patients or units not
mentioned in section 1796 and for all other health care facilities except for critical access
hospitals. If a requirement in section 1794 and a separate requirement in section 1796 both
apply to a patient, the health care facility shall assign a direct care registered nurse in
accordance with the lowest numerical patient assignment applicable to the patient.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1817, as repealed and replaced by PL 2007, c. 324, §4, is
amended to read:
§1817. Issuance of licenses
The department is authorized to issue licenses to operate hospitals, sanatoriums,
convalescent homes, rest homes, nursing homes, ambulatory surgical facilities and other
related institutions that, after inspection, are found to comply with this chapter, chapter
404-A and any rules adopted by the department. An initial license may be issued for up to
12 months. A license may be renewed for up to 24 months. The fee for this temporary or
conditional license is $15 and is payable at the time of issuance of the license regardless of
the term. When an institution, upon inspection by the department, is found not to meet all
requirements of this chapter or department rules, the department is authorized to issue
either:
1. Temporary license. A temporary license for a specified period not to exceed 90
days, during which time corrections specified by the department must be made by the
institution for compliance with this chapter, chapter 404-A and departmental rules, if in the
judgment of the commissioner the best interests of the public will be so served; or
2. Conditional license. A conditional license setting forth conditions that must be
met by the institution to the satisfaction of the department.
Failure of the institution to meet any of the department's conditions immediately voids
the temporary or conditional license by written notice by the department to the licensee or,
if the licensee cannot be reached for personal service, by notice left at the licensed premises.
A new application for a regular license may be considered by the department if, when and
after the conditions set forth by the department at the time of the issuance of this temporary
or conditional license have been met and satisfactory evidence of this fact has been
furnished to the department. The department may amend, modify or refuse to renew a
license in conformity with the Maine Administrative Procedure Act, or file a complaint
Page 14 - 132LR1940(01)

414 with the District Court requesting suspension or revocation of any license on any of the
425 following grounds: violation of this chapter or the rules issued adopted pursuant to this
436 chapter; violation of chapter 404-A or the rules adopted by the department pursuant to
447 chapter 404-A; permitting, aiding or abetting the commission of any illegal act in that
458 institution; or conduct of practices detrimental to the welfare of a patient. Whenever, on
469 inspection by the department, conditions are found to exist that violate this chapter or
570 department rules issued adopted pursuant to this chapter or violate chapter 404-A or the
581 rules adopted by the department pursuant to chapter 404-A that, in the opinion of the
592 commissioner, immediately endanger the health or safety of patients in an institution or
1503 create an emergency, the department by its duly authorized agents may, under the
1514 emergency provisions of Title 4, section 184, subsection 6, request that the District Court
1525 suspend or revoke the license. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical
1536 rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.